Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2370.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-183, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-183. Charter schools; application; requirements; immunity; exemptions; renewal of application; reprisal; fee; funds; annual reports; definitions A. An applicant seeking to establish a charter school shall apply in writing to a proposed sponsor as prescribed in subsection C of this section. The application, application process and application time frames shall be posted on the sponsor's website and shall include the following, as specified in the application adopted by the sponsor: 1. A detailed educational plan. 2. A detailed business plan. 3. A detailed operational plan. 4. Any other materials required by the sponsor. B. The sponsor of a charter school may contract with a public body, private person or private organization for the purpose of establishing a charter school pursuant to this article. C. The sponsor of a charter school may be either the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents, a community college district or a group of community college districts, subject to the following requirements: 1. An applicant may not apply for sponsorship to any person or entity other than those prescribed in this subsection. 2. The applicant may apply to the state board of education or the state board for charter schools. Notwithstanding any other law, neither the state board for charter schools nor the state board of education shall grant a charter to a school district governing board for a new charter school or for the conversion of an existing district public school to a charter school. The state board of education or the state board for charter schools may approve the application if the application meets the requirements of this article and may approve the charter if the proposed sponsor determines, within its sole discretion, that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to operate a charter school and that the applicant is applying to operate as a separate charter holder by considering factors such as whether: (a) The schools have separate governing bodies, governing body membership, staff, facilities and student population populations. (b) Daily operations are carried out by different administrators. (c) The applicant intends to have an affiliation agreement for the purpose of providing enrollment preferences. (d) The applicant's charter management organization has multiple charter holders serving varied grade configurations on one physical site or nearby sites serving one community. (e) The applicant is reconstituting an existing school site population at the same or a new site. (f) The applicant is reconstituting an existing grade configuration from a prior charter holder with at least one grade remaining on the original site with the other grade or grades moving to a new site. The state board of education or the state board for charter schools may approve any charter schools transferring charters. If the state board of education or the state board for charter schools rejects the preliminary application, the state board of education or the state board for charter schools shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection and of suggestions for improving the application. An applicant may submit a revised application for reconsideration by the state board of education or the state board for charter schools. The applicant may request, and the state board of education or the state board for charter schools may provide, technical assistance to improve the application. 3. The applicant may submit the application to a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents, a community college district or a group of community college districts. A university, a community college district or a group of community college districts shall not grant a charter to a school district governing board for a new charter school or for the conversion of an existing district public school to a charter school. A university, a community college district or a group of community college districts may approve the application if it meets the requirements of this article and if the proposed sponsor determines, in its sole discretion, that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to operate a charter school. 4. Each applicant seeking to establish a charter school shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the approving agency for the purpose of obtaining a state and federal criminal records check pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. If an applicant will have direct contact with students, the applicant shall possess a valid fingerprint clearance card that is issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1. The department of public safety may exchange this fingerprint data with the federal bureau of investigation. The criminal records check shall be completed before the issuance of a charter. 5. All persons engaged in instructional work directly as a classroom, laboratory or other teacher or indirectly as a supervisory teacher, speech therapist or principal and all charter representatives, charter school governing body members and officers, directors, members and partners of the charter holder shall have a valid fingerprint clearance card that is issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1, unless the person is a volunteer or guest speaker who is accompanied in the classroom by a person with a valid fingerprint clearance card. A charter school shall not employ in any position that requires a valid fingerprint clearance card a person against whom the state board of education has taken disciplinary action as prescribed in section 15-505 or whose certificate has been suspended, surrendered or revoked, unless the person's certificate has been subsequently reinstated by the state board of education. All other personnel shall be fingerprint checked pursuant to section 15-512, or the charter school may require those personnel to obtain a fingerprint clearance card issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1. Before employment, the charter school shall make documented, good faith efforts to contact previous employers of a person to obtain information and recommendations that may be relevant to the person's fitness for employment as prescribed in section 15-512, subsection F, including checking the educator information system that is maintained by the department of education pursuant to section 15-505. The charter school shall notify the department of public safety if the charter school or sponsor receives credible evidence that a person who possesses a valid fingerprint clearance card is arrested for or is charged with an offense listed in section 41-1758.03, subsection B. A person who is employed at a charter school that has met the requirements of this paragraph is not required to meet any additional requirements that are established by the department of education or that may be established by rule by the state board of education. The state board of education may not adopt rules that exceed the requirements for persons who are qualified to teach in charter schools prescribed in title I of the every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95) or the individuals with disabilities education improvement act of 2004 (P.L. 108-446). Charter schools may hire personnel who have not yet received a fingerprint clearance card if proof is provided of the submission of an application to the department of public safety for a fingerprint clearance card and if the charter school that is seeking to hire the applicant does all of the following: (a) Documents in the applicant's file the necessity for hiring and placing the applicant before the applicant receives a fingerprint clearance card. (b) Ensures that the department of public safety completes a statewide criminal records check on the applicant. A statewide criminal records check shall be completed by the department of public safety every one hundred twenty days until the date that the fingerprint check is completed or the fingerprint clearance card is issued or denied. (c) Obtains references from the applicant's current employer and the two most recent previous employers except for applicants who have been employed for at least five years by the applicant's most recent employer. (d) Provides general supervision of the applicant until the date that the fingerprint card is obtained. (e) Completes a search of criminal records in all local jurisdictions outside of this state in which the applicant has lived in the previous five years. (f) Verifies the fingerprint status of the applicant with the department of public safety. 6. A charter school that complies with the fingerprinting requirements of this section shall be deemed to have complied with section 15-512 and is entitled to the same rights and protections provided to school districts by section 15-512. 7. If a charter school operator is not already subject to a public meeting or hearing by the municipality in which the charter school is located, the operator of a charter school operator shall conduct a public meeting at least thirty days before the charter school operator opens a site or sites for the charter school. The charter school operator shall post notices of the public meeting in at least three different locations that are within three hundred feet of the proposed charter school site. 8. A person who is employed by a charter school or who is an applicant for employment with a charter school, who is arrested for or charged with a nonappealable offense listed in section 41-1758.03, subsection B and who does not immediately report the arrest or charge to the person's supervisor or potential employer is guilty of unprofessional conduct and the person shall be immediately dismissed from employment with the charter school or immediately excluded from potential employment with the charter school. 9. A person who is employed by a charter school and who is convicted of any nonappealable offense listed in section 41-1758.03, subsection B or is convicted of any nonappealable offense that amounts to unprofessional conduct under section 15-550 shall immediately do all of the following: (a) Surrender any certificates issued by the department of education. (b) Notify the person's employer or potential employer of the conviction. (c) Notify the department of public safety of the conviction. (d) Surrender the person's fingerprint clearance card. D. An entity that is authorized to sponsor charter schools pursuant to this article has no legal authority over or responsibility for a charter school sponsored by a different entity. This subsection does not apply to the state board of education's duty to exercise general supervision over the public school system pursuant to section 15-203, subsection A, paragraph 1. E. The charter of a charter school shall do all of the following: 1. Ensure compliance with federal, state and local rules, regulations and statutes relating to health, safety, civil rights and insurance. The department of education shall publish a list of relevant rules, regulations and statutes to notify charter schools of their responsibilities under this paragraph. 2. Ensure that it is nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies and employment practices and all other operations. 3. Ensure that it provides a comprehensive program of instruction for at least a kindergarten program or any grade between grades one and twelve, except that a charter school may offer this curriculum with an emphasis on a specific learning philosophy or style or certain subject areas such as mathematics, science, fine arts, performance arts or foreign language. 4. Ensure that it designs a method to measure pupil progress toward the pupil outcomes adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 15-741.01, including participation in the statewide assessment and the nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement test as designated by the state board and the completion and distribution of an annual report card as prescribed in chapter 7, article 3 of this title. 5. Ensure that, except as provided in this article and in its charter, it is exempt from all statutes and rules relating to schools, governing boards and school districts. 6. Ensure that, except as provided in this article, it is subject to the same financial and electronic data submission requirements as a school district, including the uniform system of financial records as prescribed in chapter 2, article 4 of this title, procurement rules as prescribed in section 15-213 and audit requirements. The auditor general shall conduct a comprehensive review and revision of the uniform system of financial records to ensure that the provisions of the uniform system of financial records that relate to charter schools are in accordance with commonly accepted accounting principles used by private business. A school's charter may include exceptions to the requirements of this paragraph that are necessary as determined by the university, the community college district, the group of community college districts, the state board of education or the state board for charter schools. The department of education or the office of the auditor general may conduct financial, program or compliance audits. 7. Ensure compliance with all federal and state laws relating to the education of children with disabilities in the same manner as a school district. 8. Ensure that it provides for a governing body for the charter school that is responsible for the policy decisions of the charter school. Notwithstanding section 1-216, if there is a vacancy or vacancies on the governing body, a majority of the remaining members of the governing body constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, unless that quorum is prohibited by the charter school's operating agreement. 9. Ensure that it provides a minimum of one hundred eighty instructional days before June 30 of each fiscal year unless it is operating on an alternative calendar approved by its sponsor. The superintendent of public instruction shall adjust the apportionment schedule accordingly to accommodate a charter school utilizing using an alternative calendar. 10. Ensure that the charter school, in conjunction with local law enforcement agencies and emergency response agencies, develop develops an emergency response plan for each school in accordance with minimum standards developed jointly by the department of education and the division of emergency management within the department of emergency and military affairs.  Any emergency response plan developed pursuant to this paragraph must address how the charter school and emergency responders will communicate with and provide assistance to students with disabilities. F. A charter school shall collect and maintain information about each teacher's educational and teaching background and experience in a particular academic content subject area. A charter school shall either post the information on the charter school's website or make the information available for inspection on request of parents and guardians of pupils enrolled at the charter school. This subsection does not require any charter school to release personally identifiable information in relation to any teacher, including the teacher's address, salary, social security number or telephone number. G. The charter of a charter school may be amended at the request of the governing body of the charter school and on the approval of the sponsor. H. Charter schools may contract, sue and be sued. I. The charter is effective for fifteen years from after the first day of the fiscal year as specified in the charter, subject to the following: 1. At least eighteen months before the charter expires, the sponsor shall notify the charter school that the charter school may apply for renewal and shall make the renewal application available to the charter school. A charter school that elects to apply for renewal shall file a complete renewal application at least fifteen months before the charter expires. A sponsor shall give written notice of its intent not to renew the charter school's request for renewal to the charter school at least twelve months before the expiration of the charter. The sponsor shall make data used in making renewal decisions available to the charter school and the public and shall provide a public report summarizing the evidence basis for each decision. The sponsor may deny the request for renewal if, in its judgment, the charter holder has failed to do any of the following: (a) Meet or make sufficient progress toward the academic performance expectations set forth in the performance framework. (b) Meet the operational performance expectations set forth in the performance framework or any improvement plans. (c) Meet the financial performance expectations set forth in the performance framework or any improvement plans. (d) Complete the obligations of the contract. (e) Comply with this article or any provision of law from which the charter school is not exempt. 2. A charter operator may apply for early renewal. At least nine months before the charter school's intended renewal consideration, the operator of the charter school shall submit a letter of intent to the sponsor to apply for early renewal. The sponsor shall review fiscal audits and academic performance data for the charter school that are annually collected by the sponsor, review the current contract between the sponsor and the charter school and provide the qualifying charter school with a renewal application. On submission of a complete application, the sponsor shall give written notice of its consideration of the renewal application. The sponsor may deny the request for early renewal if, in the sponsor's judgment, the charter holder has failed to do any of the following: (a) Meet or make sufficient progress toward the academic performance expectations set forth in the performance framework. (b) Meet the operational performance expectations set forth in the performance framework or any improvement plans. (c) Meet the financial performance expectations set forth in the performance framework or any improvement plans. (d) Complete the obligations of the contract. (e) Comply with this article or any provision of law from which the charter school is not exempt. 3. A sponsor shall review a charter at five-year intervals using a performance framework adopted by the sponsor and may revoke a charter at any time if the charter school breaches one or more provisions of its charter or if the sponsor determines that the charter holder has failed to do any of the following: (a) Meet or make sufficient progress toward the academic performance expectations set forth in the performance framework. (b) Meet the operational performance expectations set forth in the performance framework or any improvement plans. (c) Meet the financial performance expectations set forth in the performance framework or any improvement plans. (d) Comply with this article or any provision of law from which the charter school is not exempt. 4. In determining whether to renew or revoke a charter holder, the sponsor must consider making sufficient progress toward the academic performance expectations set forth in the sponsor's performance framework as one of the most important factors. 5. Before the sponsor adopts a determination of intent to revoke a charter, the charter holder shall have at least thirty days to address the problems, as necessary or applicable, associated with the reason or reasons for the determination of intent to revoke. The sponsor is not required to provide the charter holder with thirty days to correct the problems associated with the reason or reasons for adopting a determination of intent to revoke if the reason or reasons cannot be remedied, including a failure to submit required financial audits pursuant to subsection E, paragraph 6 of this section and section 15-914, or for a matter of health or safety, or both. Before the sponsor adopts a determination of intent to revoke a charter, the sponsor shall give written notice to the charter holder that includes the reason or reasons for the sponsor's consideration to revoke the charter. Notice may be provided by electronic means or by United States mail and is effective on the date of email or, if sent by United States mail, the earlier of the date of receipt by the charter holder or within five days after the notice is mailed. The determination of whether to proceed to revocation shall be made at a public meeting called for that purpose. J. The charter may be renewed for successive periods of twenty years. K. A charter school that is sponsored by the state board of education, the state board for charter schools, a university, a community college district or a group of community college districts may not be located on the property of a school district unless the school district governing board grants this authority. L. A school district governing board or a school district employee who has control over personnel actions shall not take unlawful reprisal against another employee of the school district because the employee is directly or indirectly involved in an application to establish a charter school. A governing board or a school district employee shall not take unlawful reprisal against an educational program of the school or the school district because an application to establish a charter school proposes to convert all or a portion of the educational program to a charter school. For the purposes of this subsection, "unlawful reprisal" means an action that is taken by a governing board or a school district employee as a direct result of a lawful application to establish a charter school and that is adverse to another employee or an education program and: 1. With respect to a school district employee, results in one or more of the following: (a) Disciplinary or corrective action. (b) Detail,  transfer or reassignment. (c) Suspension, demotion or dismissal. (d) An unfavorable performance evaluation. (e) A reduction in pay, benefits or awards. (f) Elimination of the employee's position without a reduction in force by reason of lack of monies or work. (g) Other significant changes in duties or responsibilities that are inconsistent with the employee's salary or employment classification. 2. With respect to an educational program, results in one or more of the following: (a) Suspension or termination of the program. (b) Transfer or reassignment of the program to a less favorable department. (c) Relocation of the program to a less favorable site within the school or school district. (d) Significant reduction or termination of funding for the program. M. Charter schools shall secure insurance for liability and property loss. The governing body of a charter school that is sponsored by the state board of education or the state board for charter schools may enter into an intergovernmental agreement or otherwise contract to participate in an insurance program offered by a risk retention pool established pursuant to section 11-952.01 or 41-621.01, or the charter school may secure its own insurance coverage. The pool may charge the requesting charter school reasonable fees for any services it performs in connection with the insurance program. N. Charter schools do not have the authority to acquire property by eminent domain. O. A sponsor, including members, officers and employees of the sponsor, is immune from personal liability for all acts done and actions taken in good faith within the scope of its authority. P. Charter school sponsors and this state are not liable for the debts or financial obligations of a charter school or persons who operate charter schools. Q. The sponsor of a charter school shall establish procedures to conduct administrative hearings on determination by the sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a charter. Procedures for administrative hearings shall be similar to procedures prescribed for adjudicative proceedings in title 41, chapter 6, article 10. Except as provided in section 41-1092.08, subsection H, final decisions of the state board of education and the state board for charter schools from hearings conducted pursuant to this subsection are subject to judicial review pursuant to title 12, chapter 7, article 6. R. The sponsoring entity sponsor of a charter school shall have oversight and administrative responsibility for the charter schools that it sponsors. In implementing its oversight and administrative responsibilities, the sponsor shall ground its actions in evidence of the charter holder's performance in accordance with the performance framework adopted by the sponsor. The performance framework shall be publicly available, shall be placed on the sponsoring entity's sponsor's website and shall include: 1. The academic performance expectations of the charter school and the measurement of sufficient progress toward the academic performance expectations. 2. The operational expectations of the charter school, including adherence to all applicable laws and obligations of the charter contract. 3. The financial expectations of the charter school. 4. Intervention and improvement policies. S. Charter schools may pledge, assign or encumber their assets to be used as collateral for loans or extensions of credit. T. All property accumulated by a charter school shall remain the property of the charter school. U. Charter schools may not locate a school on property that is less than one-fourth mile from agricultural land regulated pursuant to section 3-365, except that the owner of the agricultural land may agree to comply with the buffer zone requirements of section 3-365. If the owner agrees in writing to comply with the buffer zone requirements and records the agreement in the office of the county recorder as a restrictive covenant running with the title to the land, the charter school may locate a school within the affected buffer zone. The agreement may include any stipulations regarding the charter school, including conditions for future expansion of the school and changes in the operational status of the school that will result in a breach of the agreement. V. A transfer of a charter to another sponsor, a transfer of a charter school site to another sponsor or a transfer of a charter school site to a different charter shall be completed before the beginning of the fiscal year that the transfer is scheduled to become effective. An entity that sponsors charter schools may accept a transferring school after the beginning of the fiscal year if the transfer is approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall have the discretion to consider each transfer during the fiscal year on a case-by-case basis. A charter holder seeking to transfer sponsors shall comply with the current charter terms regarding assignment of the charter. A charter holder transferring sponsors shall notify the current sponsor that the transfer has been approved by the new sponsor. W. Notwithstanding subsection V of this section, a charter holder on an improvement plan must notify parents or guardians of registered students of the intent to transfer the charter and the timing of the proposed transfer. On the approved transfer, the new sponsor shall enforce the improvement plan but may modify the plan based on performance. X. Notwithstanding subsection Y of this section, the state board for charter schools shall charge a processing fee to any charter school that amends its contract to participate in Arizona online instruction pursuant to section 15-808. The charter Arizona online instruction processing fund is established consisting of fees collected and administered by the state board for charter schools. The state board for charter schools shall use monies in the fund only for processing contract amendments for charter schools participating in Arizona online instruction. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. Y. The sponsoring entity sponsor of a charter school may not charge any fees to a  the charter school that it sponsors unless the sponsor has provided services to the charter school and the fees represent the full value of those services provided by the sponsor.  On request, the value of the services provided by the sponsor to the charter school shall be demonstrated to the department of education. Z. Charter schools may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with a presiding judge of the juvenile court to implement a law-related education program as defined in section 15-154. The presiding judge of the juvenile court may assign juvenile probation officers to participate in a law-related education program in any charter school in the county. The cost of juvenile probation officers who participate in the program implemented pursuant to this subsection shall be funded by the charter school. AA. The sponsor of a charter school shall modify previously approved curriculum requirements for a charter school that wishes to participate in the board examination system prescribed in chapter 7, article 6 of this title. BB. If a charter school decides not to participate in the board examination system prescribed in chapter 7, article 6 of this title, pupils enrolled at that charter school may earn a Grand Canyon diploma by obtaining a passing score on the same board examinations. CC. Notwithstanding subsection Y of this section, a sponsor of charter schools may charge a new charter application processing fee to any applicant. The application fee shall fully cover the cost of application review and any needed technical assistance. Authorizers may approve policies that allow a portion of the fee to be returned to the applicant whose charter is approved. DD. A charter school may choose to provide a preschool program for children with disabilities pursuant to section 15-771. EE. Pursuant to the prescribed graduation requirements adopted by the state board of education, the governing body of a charter school operating a high school may approve a rigorous computer science course that would fulfill a mathematics course required for graduation from high school. The governing body may approve a rigorous computer science course only if the rigorous computer science course includes significant mathematics content and the governing body determines the high school where the rigorous computer science course is offered has sufficient capacity, infrastructure and qualified staff, including competent teachers of computer science. FF. A charter school may allow the use of school property, including school buildings, grounds, buses and equipment, by any person, group or organization for any lawful purpose, including a recreational, educational, political, economic, artistic, moral, scientific, social, religious or other civic or governmental purpose. The charter school may charge a reasonable fee for the use of the school property. GG. A charter school and its employees, including the governing body, or chief administrative officer, are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken to allow the use of school property, unless the charter school or its employees are guilty of gross negligence or intentional misconduct. This subsection does not limit any other immunity provisions that are prescribed by law. HH. Sponsors authorized pursuant to this section shall submit an annual report to the auditor general on or before October 1. The report shall include: 1. The current number of charters authorized and the number of charter schools operated by authorized charter holders. 2. The academic, operational and financial performance of the sponsor's charter portfolio as measured by the sponsor's adopted performance framework. 3. For the prior year, the number of new charters approved, the number of charter schools closed and the reason for the closure. 4. The sponsor's application, amendment, renewal and revocation processes, charter contract template and current performance framework as required by this section. II. The auditor general shall prescribe the format for the annual report required by subsection HH of this section and may require that the annual report be submitted electronically. The auditor general shall review the submitted annual reports to ensure that the reports include the required items in subsection HH of this section and shall make the annual reports available on request. If the auditor general finds significant noncompliance or if a sponsor fails to submit the annual report required by subsection HH of this section, on or before December 31 of each year the auditor general shall report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the chairs of the senate and house education committees or their successor committees, and the legislature shall consider revoking the sponsor's authority to sponsor charter schools. JJ. Each charter representative, charter school governing body member and officer, director, member and partner of a charter holder, as allowed by the charter holder, may have: 1. Access to the charter school's students and student records. 2. Unrestricted access to the charter school's campuses. 3. Authority to make final decisions regarding student learning in the charter school. 4. Authority to make final decisions regarding the safety of the charter school's students and school campuses. KK. IF a charter school HAS A WEAPONS DETECTION SYSTEM, THE charter school governing body may authorize THE highest-ranking officer who has authority to make final decisions described in subsection JJ, paragraph 4 of this section TO MODIFY THE SYSTEM WITHOUT PRIOR APPROVAL BY THE GOVERNING body. An officer who is authorized to modify a weapons detection system pursuant to this subsection shall REPORT each MODIFICATION TO THE GOVERNING body NOT LATER THAN TWENTY-FOUR HOURS AFTER THE officer makes the MODIFICATION.  The governing body may not authorize any other individual to modify the weapons detection system without prior approval by the governing body. KK. LL. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Charter representative" means an individual who both: (a) Has the authority to execute contracts on behalf of the charter holder in accordance with the charter holder's articles of incorporation, operating agreement or bylaws. (b) Represents the charter holder before the state board for charter schools in matters relating to accountability and compliance with federal, state and local laws and with the terms and conditions of the charter. 2. "Charter school governing body member" means an individual who is a member of a body organized to govern and manage a charter school. 3. "Officer, director, member or and partner of a charter holder": (a) Means an individual who has the authority to manage the operations and functions of a charter school or to make decisions on behalf of a charter holder. (b) Includes: (i) An individual who possesses an ownership interest or voting rights, or both, in the charter school. (ii) An individual who is identified in any of sections 10-140, 10-801, 10-840, 10-3140, 10-3840, 29-301, 29-1001, 29-3102 and 29-4101. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-341, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-341. General powers and duties; immunity; delegation A. Each school district governing board shall: 1. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures to govern the schools that are not inconsistent with the laws or rules prescribed by the state board of education. 2. Exclude from schools all books, publications, papers or audiovisual materials of a sectarian, partisan or denominational character.  This paragraph does not prohibit the elective course allowed by section 15-717.01. 3. Manage and control the school property within its district, except that a district may enter into a partnership with an entity, including a charter school, another school district or a military base, to operate a school or offer educational services in a district building, including at a vacant or partially used building, or in any building on the entity's property pursuant to a written agreement between the parties. 4. Acquire school furniture, apparatus, equipment, library books and supplies for the schools to use. 5. Prescribe the curricula and criteria for the promotion and graduation of pupils as provided in sections 15-701 and 15-701.01. 6. Furnish, repair and insure, at full insurable value, the school property of the district. 7. Construct school buildings on approval by a vote of the district electors. 8. In the name of the district, convey property belonging to the district and sold by the board. 9. Purchase school sites when authorized by a vote of the district at an election conducted as nearly as practicable in the same manner as the election provided in section 15-481 and held on a date prescribed in section 15-491, subsection E, but such authorization shall not necessarily specify the site to be purchased and such authorization shall not be necessary to exchange unimproved property as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 23. 10. Construct, improve and furnish buildings used for school purposes when such buildings or premises are leased from the national park service. 11. Purchase school sites or construct, improve and furnish school buildings from the proceeds of the sale of school property only on approval by a vote of the district electors. 12. Hold pupils to strict account for disorderly conduct on school property. 13. Discipline students for disorderly conduct on the way to and from school. 14. Except as provided in section 15-1224, deposit all monies received by the district as gifts, grants and devises with the county treasurer who shall credit the deposits as designated in the uniform system of financial records.  If not inconsistent with the terms of the gifts, grants and devises given, any balance remaining after expenditures for the intended purpose of the monies have been made shall be used to reduce school district taxes for the budget year, except that in the case of accommodation schools the county treasurer shall carry the balance forward for use by the county school superintendent for accommodation schools for the budget year. 15. Provide that, if a parent or legal guardian chooses not to accept a decision of the teacher as provided in paragraph 42 of this subsection, the parent or legal guardian may request in writing that the governing board review the teacher's decision. This paragraph does not release school districts from any liability relating to a child's promotion or retention. 16. Provide for adequate supervision over pupils in instructional and noninstructional activities by certificated or noncertificated personnel. 17. Use school monies received from the state and county school apportionment exclusively to pay salaries of teachers and other employees and contingent expenses of the district. 18. Annually report to the county school superintendent on or before October 1 in the manner and form and on the blanks prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction or county school superintendent.  The board shall also report directly to the county school superintendent or the superintendent of public instruction whenever required. 19. Deposit all monies received by school districts other than student activities monies or monies from auxiliary operations as provided in sections 15-1125 and 15-1126 with the county treasurer to the credit of the school district except as provided in paragraph 20 of this subsection and sections 15-1223 and 15-1224, and the board shall spend the monies as provided by law for other school funds. 20. Establish bank accounts in which the board during a month may deposit miscellaneous monies received directly by the district.  The board shall remit monies deposited in the bank accounts at least monthly to the county treasurer for deposit as provided in paragraph 19 of this subsection and in accordance with the uniform system of financial records. 21. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for disciplinary action against a teacher who engages in conduct that is a violation of the policies of the governing board but that is not cause for dismissal of the teacher or for revocation of the certificate of the teacher. Disciplinary action may include suspension without pay for a period of time not to exceed ten school days.  Disciplinary action shall not include suspension with pay or suspension without pay for a period of time longer than ten school days. The procedures shall include notice, hearing and appeal provisions for violations that are cause for disciplinary action.  The governing board may designate a person or persons to act on behalf of the board on these matters. 22. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for disciplinary action against an administrator who engages in conduct that is a violation of the policies of the governing board regarding duties of administrators but that is not cause for dismissal of the administrator or for revocation of the certificate of the administrator.  Disciplinary action may include suspension without pay for a period of time not to exceed ten school days.  Disciplinary action shall not include suspension with pay or suspension without pay for a period of time longer than ten school days. The procedures shall include notice, hearing and appeal provisions for violations that are cause for disciplinary action.  The governing board may designate a person or persons to act on behalf of the board on these matters. For violations that are cause for dismissal, the provisions of notice, hearing and appeal in chapter 5, article 3 of this title apply.  The filing of a timely request for a hearing suspends the imposition of a suspension without pay or a dismissal pending completion of the hearing. 23. Notwithstanding sections 13-3108 and 13-3120, prescribe and enforce policies and procedures that prohibit a person from carrying or possessing a weapon on school grounds unless the person is a peace officer or has obtained specific authorization from the school administrator.  If the school district has a weapons detection system at a school that is operated by the district, the policies and procedures may authorize the school district superintendent to modify the system without prior approval by the governing board.  A superintendent who is authorized to modify a weapons detection system pursuant to this paragraph shall report each modification to the governing board not later than twenty-four hours after the superintendent makes the modification.  The school district governing board may not prescribe policies and procedures that authorize any person other than the superintendent to modify the weapons detection system without prior approval by the governing board. 24. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures relating to the health and safety of all pupils participating in district-sponsored practice sessions or games or other interscholastic athletic activities, including: (a) The provision of water. (b) Guidelines, information and forms, developed in consultation with a statewide private entity that supervises interscholastic activities, to inform and educate coaches, pupils and parents of the dangers of concussions and head injuries and the risks of continued participation in athletic activity after a concussion. The policies and procedures shall require that, before a pupil participates in an athletic activity, the pupil and the pupil's parent sign an information form at least once each school year that states that the parent is aware of the nature and risk of concussion.  The policies and procedures shall require that a pupil who is suspected of sustaining a concussion in a practice session, game or other interscholastic athletic activity be immediately removed from the athletic activity and that the pupil's parent or guardian be notified.  A coach from the pupil's team or an official or a licensed health care provider may remove a pupil from play.  A team parent may also remove the parent's own child from play.  A pupil may return to play on the same day if a health care provider rules out a suspected concussion at the time the pupil is removed from play. On a subsequent day, the pupil may return to play if the pupil has been evaluated by and received written clearance to resume participation in athletic activity from a health care provider who has been trained in evaluating and managing concussions and head injuries. A health care provider who is a volunteer and who provides clearance to participate in athletic activity on the day of the suspected injury or on a subsequent day is immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on good faith implementation of the requirements of this subdivision, except in cases of gross negligence or wanton or wilful neglect. A school district, school district employee, team coach, official or team volunteer or a parent or guardian of a team member is not subject to civil liability for any act, omission or policy undertaken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this subdivision or for a decision made or an action taken by a health care provider. A group or organization that uses property or facilities owned or operated by a school district for athletic activities shall comply with the requirements of this subdivision.  A school district and its employees and volunteers are not subject to civil liability for any other person or organization's failure or alleged failure to comply with the requirements of this subdivision. This subdivision does not apply to teams that are based in another state and that participate in an athletic activity in this state.  For the purposes of this subdivision, athletic activity does not include dance, rhythmic gymnastics, competitions or exhibitions of academic skills or knowledge or other similar forms of physical noncontact activities, civic activities or academic activities, whether engaged in for the purposes of competition or recreation. For the purposes of this subdivision, "health care provider" means a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 14 or 17, an athletic trainer who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 41, a nurse practitioner who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, and a physician assistant who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 25. (c) Guidelines, information and forms that are developed in consultation with a statewide private entity that supervises interscholastic activities to inform and educate coaches, pupils and parents of the dangers of heat-related illnesses, sudden cardiac death and prescription opioid use. Before a pupil participates in any district-sponsored practice session or game or other interscholastic athletic activity, the pupil and the pupil's parent must be provided with information at least once each school year on the risks of heat-related illnesses, sudden cardiac death and prescription opioid addiction. 25. Establish an assessment, data gathering and reporting system as prescribed in chapter 7, article 3 of this title. 26. Provide special education programs and related services pursuant to section 15-764, subsection A to all children with disabilities as defined in section 15-761. 27. Administer competency tests prescribed by the state board of education for the graduation of pupils from high school. 28. Ensure that insurance coverage is secured for all construction projects for purposes of general liability, property damage and workers' compensation and secure performance and payment bonds for all construction projects. 29. Collect and maintain information about each current and former teacher's educational and teaching background and experience in a particular academic content subject area. A school district shall either post the information on the school district's website or make the information available for inspection on request of parents and guardians of pupils enrolled at a school. This paragraph does not require any school to release personally identifiable information in relation to any teacher, including the teacher's address, salary, social security number or telephone number. 30. Report to local law enforcement agencies any suspected crime against a person or property that is a serious offense as defined in section 13-706 or that involves a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument or serious physical injury and any conduct that poses a threat of death or serious physical injury to employees, students or anyone on the property of the school.  This paragraph does not limit or preclude the reporting by a school district or an employee of a school district of suspected crimes other than those required to be reported by this paragraph. For the purposes of this paragraph, "dangerous instrument", "deadly weapon" and "serious physical injury" have the same meanings prescribed in section 13-105. 31. In conjunction with local law enforcement agencies and emergency response agencies, develop an emergency response plan for each school in the school district in accordance with minimum standards developed jointly by the department of education and the division of emergency management within the department of emergency and military affairs.  Any emergency response plan developed pursuant to this paragraph must address how the school and emergency responders will communicate with and provide assistance to students with disabilities. 32. Provide written notice to the parents or guardians of all students enrolled in the school district at least ten days before a public meeting to discuss closing a school within the school district. The notice shall include the reasons for the proposed closure and the time and place of the meeting. The governing board shall fix a time for a public meeting on the proposed closure not less than ten days before voting in a public meeting to close the school.  The school district governing board shall give notice of the time and place of the meeting. At the time and place designated in the notice, the school district governing board shall hear reasons for or against closing the school. The school district governing board is exempt from this paragraph if the governing board determines that the school shall be closed because it poses a danger to the health or safety of the pupils or employees of the school. A governing board may consult with the division of school facilities within the department of administration for technical assistance and for information on the impact of closing a school. The information provided from the division of school facilities within the department of administration shall not require the governing board to take or not take any action. 33. Incorporate instruction on Native American history into appropriate existing curricula. 34. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures: (a) Allowing pupils who have been diagnosed with anaphylaxis by a health care provider licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 14, 17 or 25 or by a registered nurse practitioner licensed and certified pursuant to title 32, chapter 15 to carry and self-administer emergency medications, including epinephrine delivery systems, while at school and at school-sponsored activities. The pupil's name on the prescription label on the medication container or on the medication device and annual written documentation from the pupil's parent or guardian to the school that authorizes possession and self-administration is sufficient proof that the pupil is entitled to possess and self-administer the medication. The policies shall require a pupil who uses an epinephrine delivery system while at school and at school-sponsored activities to notify the nurse or the designated school staff person of the use of the medication as soon as practicable.  A school district and its employees are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on good faith implementation of the requirements of this subdivision, except in cases of wanton or wilful neglect. (b) For the emergency administration of epinephrine delivery systems by a trained employee of a school district pursuant to section 15-157. 35. Allow the possession and self-administration of prescription medication for breathing disorders in handheld inhaler devices by pupils who have been prescribed that medication by a health care professional licensed pursuant to title 32. The pupil's name on the prescription label on the medication container or on the handheld inhaler device and annual written documentation from the pupil's parent or guardian to the school that authorizes possession and self-administration is sufficient proof that the pupil is entitled to possess and self-administer the medication. A school district and its employees are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on a good faith implementation of the requirements of this paragraph. 36. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures to prohibit pupils from harassing, intimidating and bullying other pupils on school grounds, on school property, on school buses, at school bus stops, at school-sponsored events and activities and through the use of electronic technology or electronic communication on school computers, networks, forums and mailing lists that include the following components: (a) A procedure for pupils, parents and school district employees to confidentially report to school officials incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying. The school shall make available written forms designed to provide a full and detailed description of the incident and any other relevant information about the incident. (b) A requirement that school district employees report in writing suspected incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying to the appropriate school official and a description of appropriate disciplinary procedures for employees who fail to report suspected incidents that are known to the employee. (c) A requirement that, at the beginning of each school year, school officials provide all pupils with a written copy of the rights, protections and support services available to a pupil who is an alleged victim of an incident reported pursuant to this paragraph. (d) If an incident is reported pursuant to this paragraph, a requirement that school officials provide a pupil who is an alleged victim of the incident with a written copy of the rights, protections and support services available to that pupil. (e) A formal process for documenting reported incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying and providing for the confidentiality, maintenance and disposition of this documentation.  School districts shall maintain documentation of all incidents reported pursuant to this paragraph for at least six years. The school shall not use that documentation to impose disciplinary action unless the appropriate school official has investigated and determined that the reported incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying occurred. If a school provides documentation of reported incidents to persons other than school officials or law enforcement, all individually identifiable information shall be redacted. (f) A formal process for the appropriate school officials to investigate suspected incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying, including procedures for notifying the alleged victim and the alleged victim's parent or guardian when a school official or employee becomes aware of the suspected incident of harassment, intimidation or bullying. (g) Disciplinary procedures for pupils who have admitted or been found to have committed incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying. (h) A procedure that sets forth consequences for submitting false reports of incidents of harassment, intimidation or bullying. (i) Procedures designed to protect the health and safety of pupils who are physically harmed as the result of incidents of harassment, intimidation and bullying, including, if appropriate, procedures to contact emergency medical services or law enforcement agencies, or both. (j) Definitions of harassment, intimidation and bullying. 37. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures regarding changing or adopting attendance boundaries that include the following components: (a) A procedure for holding public meetings to discuss attendance boundary changes or adoptions that allows public comments. (b) A procedure to notify the parents or guardians of the students affected, including assurance that, if that school remains open as part of the boundary change and capacity is available, students assigned to a new attendance area may stay enrolled in their current school. (c) A procedure to notify the residents of the households affected by the attendance boundary changes. (d) A process for placing public meeting notices and proposed maps on the school district's website for public review, if the school district maintains a website. (e) A formal process for presenting the attendance boundaries of the affected area in public meetings that allows public comments. (f) A formal process for notifying the residents and parents or guardians of the affected area as to the decision of the governing board on the school district's website, if the school district maintains a website. (g) A formal process for updating attendance boundaries on the school district's website within ninety days after an adopted boundary change. The school district shall send a direct link to the school district's attendance boundaries website to the department of real estate. 38. If the state board of education determines that the school district has committed an overexpenditure as defined in section 15-107, provide a copy of the fiscal management report submitted pursuant to section 15-107, subsection H on its website and make copies available to the public on request. The school district shall comply with a request within five business days after receipt. 39. Ensure that the contract for the superintendent is structured in a manner in which up to twenty percent of the total annual salary included for the superintendent in the contract is classified as performance pay. This paragraph does not require school districts to increase total compensation for superintendents. Unless the school district governing board votes to implement an alternative procedure at a public meeting called for this purpose, the performance pay portion of the superintendent's total annual compensation shall be determined as follows: (a) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined based on the percentage of academic gain determined by the department of education of pupils who are enrolled in the school district compared to the academic gain achieved by the highest ranking of the fifty largest school districts in this state. For the purposes of this subdivision, the department of education shall determine academic gain by the academic growth achieved by each pupil who has been enrolled at the same school in a school district for at least five consecutive months measured against that pupil's academic results in the 2008-2009 school year. For the purposes of this subdivision, of the fifty largest school districts in this state, the school district with pupils who demonstrate the highest statewide percentage of overall academic gain measured against academic results for the 2008-2009 school year shall be assigned a score of 100 and the school district with pupils who demonstrate the lowest statewide percentage of overall academic gain measured against academic results for the 2008-2009 school year shall be assigned a score of 0. (b) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined by the percentage of parents of pupils who are enrolled at the school district who assign a letter grade of "A" to the school on a survey of parental satisfaction with the school district. The parental satisfaction survey shall be administered and scored by an independent entity that is selected by the governing board and that demonstrates sufficient expertise and experience to accurately measure the results of the survey. The parental satisfaction survey shall use standard random sampling procedures and provide anonymity and confidentiality to each parent who participates in the survey. The letter grade scale used on the parental satisfaction survey shall direct parents to assign one of the following letter grades: (i) A letter grade of "A" if the school district is excellent. (ii) A letter grade of "B" if the school district is above average. (iii) A letter grade of "C" if the school district is average. (iv) A letter grade of "D" if the school district is below average. (v) A letter grade of "F" if the school district is a failure. (c) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined by the percentage of teachers who are employed at the school district and who assign a letter grade of "A" to the school on a survey of teacher satisfaction with the school. The teacher satisfaction survey shall be administered and scored by an independent entity that is selected by the governing board and that demonstrates sufficient expertise and experience to accurately measure the results of the survey. The teacher satisfaction survey shall use standard random sampling procedures and provide anonymity and confidentiality to each teacher who participates in the survey.  The letter grade scale used on the teacher satisfaction survey shall direct teachers to assign one of the following letter grades: (i) A letter grade of "A" if the school district is excellent. (ii) A letter grade of "B" if the school district is above average. (iii) A letter grade of "C" if the school district is average. (iv) A letter grade of "D" if the school district is below average. (v) A letter grade of "F" if the school district is a failure. (d) Twenty-five percent of the performance pay shall be determined by other criteria selected by the governing board. 40. Maintain and store permanent public records of the school district as required by law. Notwithstanding section 39-101, the standards adopted by the Arizona state library, archives and public records for the maintenance and storage of school district public records shall allow school districts to elect to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph by maintaining and storing these records either on paper or in an electronic format, or a combination of a paper and electronic format. 41. Adopt in a public meeting and implement policies for principal evaluations. Before adopting principal evaluation policies, the school district governing board shall provide opportunities for public discussion on the proposed policies. The governing board shall adopt policies that: (a) Are designed to improve principal performance and improve student achievement. (b) Include the use of quantitative data on the academic progress for all students, which shall account for between twenty percent and thirty-three percent of the evaluation outcomes. (c) Include four performance classifications, designated as highly effective, effective, developing and ineffective. (d) Describe both of the following: (i) The methods used to evaluate the performance of principals, including the data used to measure student performance and job effectiveness. (ii) The formula used to determine evaluation outcomes. 42. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures that define the duties of principals and teachers. These policies and procedures shall authorize teachers to take and maintain daily classroom attendance, make the decision to promote or retain a pupil in a grade in common school or to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school, subject to review by the governing board in the manner provided in section 15-342, paragraph 11. 43. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for the emergency administration by an employee of a school district pursuant to section 36-2267 of naloxone hydrochloride or any other opioid antagonist approved by the United States food and drug administration. 44. In addition to the notification requirements prescribed in paragraph 36 of this subsection, prescribe and enforce reasonable and appropriate policies to notify a pupil's parent or guardian if any person engages in harassing, threatening or intimidating conduct against that pupil. A school district and its officials and employees are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken that are based on good faith implementation of the requirements of this paragraph, except in cases of gross negligence or wanton or wilful neglect.  A person engages in threatening or intimidating if the person threatens or intimidates by word or conduct to cause physical injury to another person or serious damage to the property of another on school grounds.  A person engages in harassment if, with intent to harass or with knowledge that the person is harassing another person, the person anonymously or otherwise contacts, communicates or causes a communication with another person by verbal, electronic, mechanical, telephonic or written means in a manner that harasses on school grounds or substantially disrupts the school environment. 45. Each fiscal year, provide to each school district employee a total compensation statement that is broken down by category of benefit or payment and that includes, for that employee, at least all of the following: (a) Base salary and any additional pay. (b) Medical benefits and the value of any employer-paid portions of insurance plan premiums. (c) Retirement benefit plans, including social security. (d) Legally required benefits. (e) Any paid leave. (f) Any other payment made to or on behalf of the employee. (g) Any other benefit provided to the employee. 46. Develop and adopt in a public meeting policies to allow for visits, tours and observations of all classrooms by parents of enrolled pupils and parents who wish to enroll their children in the school district unless a visit, tour or observation threatens the health and safety of pupils and staff.  These policies and procedures must be easily accessible from the home page on each school's website. B. Notwithstanding subsection A, paragraphs 7, 9 and 11 of this section, the county school superintendent may construct, improve and furnish school buildings or purchase or sell school sites in the conduct of an accommodation school. C. If any school district acquires real or personal property, whether by purchase, exchange, condemnation, gift or otherwise, the governing board shall pay to the county treasurer any taxes on the property that were unpaid as of the date of acquisition, including penalties and interest.  The lien for unpaid delinquent taxes, penalties and interest on property acquired by a school district: 1. Is not abated, extinguished, discharged or merged in the title to the property. 2. Is enforceable in the same manner as other delinquent tax liens. D. The governing board may not locate a school on property that is less than one-fourth mile from agricultural land regulated pursuant to section 3-365, except that the owner of the agricultural land may agree to comply with the buffer zone requirements of section 3-365. If the owner agrees in writing to comply with the buffer zone requirements and records the agreement in the office of the county recorder as a restrictive covenant running with the title to the land, the school district may locate a school within the affected buffer zone. The agreement may include any stipulations regarding the school, including conditions for future expansion of the school and changes in the operational status of the school that will result in a breach of the agreement. E. A school district, its governing board members, its school council members and its employees are immune from civil liability for the consequences of adopting and implementing policies and procedures pursuant to subsection A of this section and section 15-342.  This waiver does not apply if the school district, its governing board members, its school council members or its employees are guilty of gross negligence or intentional misconduct. F. A governing board may delegate in writing to a superintendent, principal or head teacher the authority to prescribe procedures that are consistent with the governing board's policies. G. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a school district governing board shall not take any action that would result in a reduction of pupil square footage unless the governing board notifies the school facilities oversight board established by section 41-5701.02 of the proposed action and receives written approval from the school facilities oversight board to take the action. A reduction includes an increase in administrative space that results in a reduction of pupil square footage or sale of school sites or buildings, or both. A reduction includes a reconfiguration of grades that results in a reduction of pupil square footage of any grade level. This subsection does not apply to temporary reconfiguration of grades to accommodate new school construction if the temporary reconfiguration does not exceed one year. The sale of equipment that results in a reduction that falls below the equipment requirements prescribed in section 41-5711, subsection B is subject to commensurate withholding of school district district additional assistance monies pursuant to the direction of the school facilities oversight board. Except as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 10, proceeds from the sale of school sites, buildings or other equipment shall be deposited in the school plant fund as provided in section 15-1102. H. Subsections C through G of this section apply to a county board of supervisors and a county school superintendent when operating and administering an accommodation school. I. A school district governing board may delegate authority in writing to the superintendent of the school district to submit plans for new school facilities to the school facilities oversight board for the purpose of certifying that the plans meet the minimum school facility adequacy guidelines prescribed in section 41-5711. J. For the purposes of subsection A, paragraph 37 of this section, attendance boundaries may not be used to require students to attend certain schools based on the student's place of residence. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.